Wisconsin, session 2025, SB315.
do enact as follows:SB315,1Section 1. 224.72 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:224.72 (4) (b) Submit evidence that establishes, to the division’s satisfaction, a minimum net worth of $250,000 for a mortgage banker or $100,000 for a mortgage broker. Evidence of net worth shall include the submission of recent financial statements accompanied by a written statement by an independent certified public accountant attesting that he or she has reviewed the financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. This paragraph does not apply to a mortgage broker. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb315 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb315 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB315 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB315 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB315: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting